Massachusetts, session 194th, H3312.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 7E of chapter 81 of the General Laws, or any
other general or special law to the contrary, the secretary of the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation may convey to Wakefield Investments, Inc. a certain parcel of land in the town of
Stoneham owned by the Massachusetts Department of Transportation and taken for highway
purposes in 1958 under Highway Layout 4724, for the purposes of reconstructing an off-ramp
from the Interstate 93 northbound to Montvale avenue and Maple street.
of 2

(b) The parcel of land to be conveyed pursuant to subsection (a) is described as the
property situated in the town of Stoneham, herein known as a portion of Parcel 2-31, which is
landlocked to the abutting property owner at 100 Maple street, and described in an order of
taking, dated September 23, 1958 and recorded in the Middlesex south registry of deeds in book
9244, page 114, containing 12,500 square feet of land, more or less.
SECTION 2. The consideration for the conveyance authorized in section 1 shall be the
full and fair market value of the parcel as determined by the secretary of Massachusetts
Department of Transportation, and as agreed to by the abutting property owner, Wakefield
Investments, Inc. Said parcel shall be conveyed in its present condition, including as is, where is
and with all faults, through the Massachusetts Department of Transportation’s standard form
release deed.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Wakefield
Investments, Inc., of Wakefield, Massachusetts, shall be responsible for all of costs and expenses
related to the conveyance authorized in section 1, including, but not limited to costs associated
with any engineering, surveys, layout alterations, recording costs, appraisals and deed
preparation related to the conveyance authorized in section 1 as such costs may be determined by
the secretary of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
of 2